Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 98.26 of Title 25, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The ArmaLite AR-15 is hereby designated and adopted as the state


firearm of the State of Oklahoma.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3181 CN 1/14/2026 10:34:20 AM











Req. No. 3181 Page 1